Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3223
Immunity.

Any member of the board, employee of the board, or person under contract with the board shall be immune from any civil action or criminal prosecution for initiating or assisting in any lawful investigation of the actions of or any disciplinary proceeding concerning an appraisal management company pursuant to the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act if the member, employee, or person initiates or assists in such investigation or proceeding without malicious intent and in the reasonable belief that the investigation or proceeding was allowed by the powers vested in such member, employee, or person.

Laws 2024, LB989, § 11.